Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.140

Consultation with other health care practitioners—Patient waiver—Emergencies—Penalty.

(1) When a person licensed under this chapter sees patients with potentially serious disorders such as cardiac conditions, acute abdominal symptoms, and such other conditions, the practitioner shall immediately request a consultation or recent written diagnosis from a primary health care provider licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, or 18.71A RCW or RCW 18.79.050. In the event that the patient with the disorder refuses to authorize such consultation or provide a recent diagnosis from such primary health care provider, acupuncture or Eastern medicine treatments may only be continued after the patient signs a written waiver acknowledging the risks associated with the failure to pursue treatment from a primary health care provider. The waiver must also include: (a) An explanation of an acupuncturist's or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner's scope of practice, including the services and techniques acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners are authorized to provide and (b) a statement that the services and techniques that an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner is authorized to provide will not resolve the patient's underlying potentially serious disorder. The requirements of the waiver shall be established by the secretary in rule.

(2) In an emergency, a person licensed under this chapter shall: (a) Initiate the emergency medical system by calling 911; (b) request an ambulance; and (c) provide patient support until emergency response arrives.

(3) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2020 c 80 s 13; 2019 c 308 s 9; 2015 c 60 s 2; 2010 c 286 s 9; 2003 c 53 s 122; 1995 c 323 s 12; 1991 c 3 s 14; 1985 c 326 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.